Washington statutes.
RCW 31.24.080

Amendment of articles of incorporation—Director's approval—Filing.

(1) The articles of incorporation of a business development company may be amended by the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the votes to which the stockholders are entitled, subject to the written approval of the director.

(2) Within thirty days after an amendment of the articles of incorporation has been adopted and approved by the director, the articles of amendment shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state by the director. An amendment shall not take effect until it has been so filed.

[ 2006 c 87 s 11; 1994 c 92 s 235; 1963 c 162 s 8.]